Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,196
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

(MBCA 14.23) (a) If the Secretary
of State denies a corporation's application for reinstatement following administrative
dissolution, the Secretary of State shall serve the corporation under section
21-236 with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

(b) The corporation may appeal
the denial of reinstatement to the district court of Lancaster County within
thirty days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The corporation
appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching
to the petition copies of the Secretary of State's certificate of dissolution,
the corporation's application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State's
notice of denial.

(c)
The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the dissolved
corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

(d) The court's final decision
may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 196.
January 1, 2016